hunspell/Indianus.aff
SET UTF-8

SFX P Y 2
SFX P um os um
SFX P are os are

SFX Q Y 2
SFX Q m s um
SFX Q are us are 

SFX M Y 2
SFX M um em um
SFX M are em are

SFX A Y 2
SFX A are at are
SFX A um at um

SFX B Y 2
SFX B are i are
SFX B um i um

SFX C Y 2
SFX C are unt are
SFX C um unt um

SFX D Y 2
SFX D are e are
SFX D um e um

SFX E Y 2
SFX E are emus are
SFX E um emus um

SFX F Y 2
SFX F are ita are
SFX F um ita um

SFX X Y 1
SFX X are um are

SFX Z Y 1
SFX Z um are um

SFX G Y 2
SFX G um itas um
SFX G are itas are

SFX H Y 2
SFX H um atio um
SFX H are atio are
