hunspell/Indianus.dic
abacare/XPQABCDEFGH
abacilium/ZPQABCDEFGH
abundare/XPQABCDEFGH
addendum/ZPQABCDEF
addonare/XPQABCDEFGH
adportare/XPQABCDEFGH
advenare/XPQABCDEFGH
